Hawaii statutes.
§126-1 Authorization to director. The
director of finance is authorized to enable the State to qualify and
participate in the federal flood insurance program, pursuant to any applicable
provisions of Public Law 1016, Eighty-fourth Congress, Second Session. The
director of finance shall be vested with the functions, powers, and duties
which are necessary to enable the State to qualify and participate in the flood
insurance program. [L 1957, c 178, §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c
114, §1; Supp, §358B-2; HRS §126-1; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

County authorization,
see §46-11.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next